Hawaii statutes.
§11-314 Duties of the commission.
The duties of the commission under this part are to:

(1) Develop and adopt forms required by this part;

(2) Adopt and publish a manual for all candidates,
candidate committees, and noncandidate committees, describing the requirements
of this part, including uniform and simple methods of recordkeeping;

(3) Preserve all reports required by this part for at
least ten years from the date of receipt by the commission;

(4) Permit the inspection, copying, or duplication of
any report required by this part pursuant to rules adopted by the commission
under chapter 91; provided that this paragraph shall not apply to the sale or
use of information under section 11-344;

(5) Ascertain whether any person has failed to file a
report required by this part or has filed a substantially defective or
deficient report. The commission shall notify the person by first class mail
that a fine may be assessed for the failure to file or the filing of a
substantially defective or deficient report, and the defective or deficient
report shall be corrected and explained. All fines collected under this
section as authorized by sections 11-340 and 11-410 shall be deposited in the
general fund of the State;

(6) Hold public hearings;

(7) Investigate and hold hearings for receiving
evidence of any violations pursuant to subpart I of this part;

(8) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91;

(9) Request the initiation of prosecution for the
violation of this part pursuant to section 11-411;

(10) Administer and monitor the distribution of public
funds under this part;

(11) Suggest accounting methods for candidates,
candidate committees, or noncandidate committees in connection with reports and
records required by this part;

(12) Employ or contract with, without regard to
chapters 76, 78, and 89, persons it finds necessary for the performance of its
functions, including a full-time executive director, and to fix their
compensation; provided that the commission shall have the authority, at its
discretion, to dismiss persons employed by or contracted with the commission;

(13) Conduct random audits and field investigations,
as necessary; and

(14) File for injunctive relief when indicated. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 112, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next